apertium-es-gl.es.dix
<pardef n="mallorqu_ín__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ines</l>      <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ín</l>        <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="reh_én__n">
  <e>       <p><l>enes</l>      <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>én</l>        <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sart_én__n">
  <e>       <p><l>enes</l>      <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>én</l>        <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="g_ermen__n">
  <e>       <p><l>érmenes</l>   <r>ermen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ermen</l>     <r>ermen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lor_d__n">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="parch_ís__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ises</l>      <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ís</l>        <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="af_ín__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ines</l>      <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ín</l>        <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="comp_ás__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ases</l>      <r>ás<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ás</l>        <r>ás<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d/olmen__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ólmenes</l>   <r>olmen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olmen</l>     <r>olmen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="afín"><i>af</i><par n="af_ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bailarín"><i>bailar</i><par n="mallorqu_ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="danzarín"><i>danzar</i><par n="mallorqu_ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mallorquín"><i>mallorqu</i><par n="mallorqu_ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="compás"><i>comp</i><par n="comp_ás__n"/></e>
<e lm="dolmen"><i>d</i><par n="d/olmen__n"/></e>
<e lm="germen"><i>g</i><par n="g_ermen__n"/></e>
<e lm="lord"><i>lor</i><par n="lor_d__n"/></e>
<e lm="parchís"><i>parch</i><par n="parch_ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="rehén"><i>reh</i><par n="reh_én__n"/></e>
<e lm="sartén"><i>sart</i><par n="sart_én__n"/></e>
